Maryland, session 2025, SB0153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
8–1010.
(e) On or before December 31, 2014, and each December 31 thereafter, the
Department shall submit an annual report to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate [Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee
and the House Environment and Transportation Committee on:
(1) Participation in the Program; and
(2) Recommendations of the oversight committee established in § 8–1013
of this subtitle.
Article – Business Regulation
8–204.
(c) On or before December 1 of each year, the Commission shall report to the
Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House Economic Matters Committee, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, regarding:
(1) the attendance record of each Commission meeting, disaggregated by
the constituency that the attendee represents pursuant to the attendee’s appointment
under § 8–202(a)(2) of this subtitle; and

SENATE BILL 153 5
(2) how many claims were pending as of the date of each meeting.
Article – Economic Development
5–2111.
The Advisory Commission shall issue a report each year to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate [Education, Health,
and Environmental Affairs] FINANCE Committee and the House Economic Matters
Committee on the Advisory Commission’s findings and recommendations.
Article – Education
5–109.
(c) (2) The results shall be reported within 3 months after the close of the fiscal
year for the county board on the form and in the manner required by the State Board to:
(v) The Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs]
EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee;
5–242.
(h) On or before December 1, 2022, the Department shall submit an
evidence–based report summarizing the status of efforts under the Initiative, including
recommendations to increase the success of the Initiative, to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate [Education, Health,
and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT
Committee and the House Committee on Ways and Means.
7–117.
(c) The annual evaluation funded under subsection (b)(4) of this section shall:
(4) On completion, be provided to:
(vi) The Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs]
EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee;
7–212.
(b) (4) Each county board shall:
(ii) On or before October 1, 2022, and each October 1 thereafter, send
a copy of its outreach plan required under this subsection to the Department, the Maryland

SENATE BILL 153
Higher Education Commission, the Financial Assistance Advisory Council, and the Senate
[Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee, the House Appropriations Committee, and the House
Committee on Ways and Means, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article.
(d) (1) On or before April 1, 2022, the Financial Assistance Advisory Council
in the Maryland Higher Education Commission shall submit a report to the Senate
[Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee, the House Appropriations Committee, and the House
Committee on Ways and Means, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, on ways to assist county boards with connecting students to financial aid
opportunities, including:
(i) Identifying best practices; and
(ii) Compiling relevant materials and toolkits.
7–424.
(g) (1) The Department shall submit a report on or before March 31 each year
to the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY,
AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House Ways and Means Committee, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, consisting of a summary of the
information included in the victim of bullying, harassment, or intimidation report forms
filed with the county boards the previous year.
11–406.
(d) (2) On or before December 1 of each year, the Commission shall submit a
report, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the Senate
[Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee, the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the House
Appropriations Committee, and the House Committee on Ways and Means on the extent to
which the institutions of higher education in the State are in compliance with the diversity
goals of the State Plan for Higher Education.
11–601.
(i) On or before October 1, 2016, and every 2 years thereafter, the Commission
shall:
(1) Report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs]
EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee, the Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee, the House Health and Government Operations Committee, and the

SENATE BILL 153 7
House Appropriations Committee on the reports required under subsection (h) of this
section; and
11–1601.
(d) Each institution of higher education shall submit to the Commission and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate [Education, Health,
and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT
Committee and the House Appropriations Committee:
(1) On or before October 1, 2019, the written policy adopted in accordance
with subsection (b)(1) of this section; and
(2) Any changes to the policy.
(e) (2) On or before August 1, 2020, and each August 1 thereafter, the
Commission shall report, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to
the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND
THE ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House Appropriations Committee a summary of
the submissions under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
Article – Election Law
1–303.1.
(d) On or before January 1 each year, the local board of elections for Baltimore
City shall submit a report to the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs]
EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee, the Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee, the House Committee on Ways and Means, and the House
Appropriations Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
on the following information submitted to the ballot drop box, disaggregated by each weekly
collection from the ballot drop box and by the State Board or the local board that is the
intended recipient of the election–related materials:
(1) the number of absentee ballot applications received and accepted;
(2) absentee ballots received and accepted; and
(3) other election–related materials received.
1–303.2.
(e) On or before January 15 each year, the State Board shall submit a report to
the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND
THE ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House Ways and Means Committee, in

SENATE BILL 153
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, that includes the following
information, disaggregated by correctional facility:
(1) the number of eligible voters who registered to vote, attempted to vote,
and voted successfully by absentee ballot during the immediately preceding calendar year;
(2) the number of times the State Board or a local board of elections visited
each correctional facility during the immediately preceding calendar year, the duration of
each visit, and a description of the work done at each correctional facility;
(3) a description of any obstacles to implementing this section or § 2–501
of the Correctional Services Article; and
(4) any recommendations for improving the implementation of this section
or § 2–501 of the Correctional Services Article.
3–203.
(j) (1) Each automatic voter registration agency shall:
(i) on or before July 1, 2019, submit a report, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the Senate [Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee
and the House Committee on Ways and Means that describes:
1. the efforts of the automatic voter registration agency to
register voters in the preceding calendar year; and
2. the implementation of an automatic voter registration
system; and
(ii) on or before January 1, 2020, and January 1 each subsequent
year, submit a report, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the
Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House Committee on Ways and Means that describes:
1. the number of individuals who completed an applicable
transaction in the preceding calendar year at the automatic voter registration agency and
the number of those individuals who registered to vote or updated a voter registration
record; and
2. any efforts the automatic voter registration agency plans
to make to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the voter registration process at the
agency.
3–204.

SENATE BILL 153 9
(j) On or before January 1, 2018, and January 1 each subsequent year, the
Maryland Department of Labor shall submit a report, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, to the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs]
EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House Ways and
Means Committee that describes:
(1) the efforts of the one–stop career centers to register voters under this
section in the preceding calendar year; and
(2) any efforts the Department plans to make to improve the efficiency and
effectiveness of the voter registration process at the one–stop career centers.
3–204.2.
(f) (3) (ii) On or before January 15 each year, the Commission shall compile
and summarize the information reported by public institutions of higher education under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph in a single report and submit the report to the Senate
[Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House Committee on Ways and Means in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
(4) (ii) On or before January 15 each year, the Association shall compile
and summarize the information reported by its members under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph in a single report and submit the report to the Senate [Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee
and the House Committee on Ways and Means in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
Article – Environment
2–1212.
(b) (2) (iii) On or before December 1 each year, the Program Coordinator
shall:
2. Report, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, to the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs]
EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House
Environment and Transportation Committee on the State’s progress toward meeting the
goals established under subsection (a) of this section.
2–1401.
(b) On or before December 1, 2018, and on or before December 1 each year
thereafter, the Governor shall report to the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental
Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House

SENATE BILL 153
Environment and Transportation Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, on the State’s participation in the U.S. Climate Alliance, including:
(1) Any collaborations or partnerships among the Alliance members or
external stakeholders; and
(2) Any policies or programs that the Alliance has endorsed, undertaken,
or considered.
4–202.1.
(j) (7) Beginning September 1, 2016, and every year thereafter, the
Department shall submit a report evaluating the compliance of counties and municipalities
with the requirements of this section to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs]
EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House
Environment and Transportation Committee.
5–203.1.
(d) On or before December 31 of each year, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the Department shall prepare and submit an annual report to
the House Environment and Transportation Committee, the House Appropriations
Committee, the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION,
ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee, and the Senate Budget and Taxation
Committee on the Wetlands and Waterways Program Fund, including an accounting of
financial receipts deposited into the Fund and expenditures from the Fund.
9–320.
(h) On or before January 15 of each year, the Department shall report to the
Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House Environment and Transportation Committee,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the status of the Maryland
Clean Water Fund, including a detailed description of all revenues and expenditures of the
Fund for the previous year.
9–1605.2.
(h) (9) On or before December 31 each year, the Department of the
Environment shall submit a report, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, to the House [Environmental Matters] ENVIRONMENT AND TRANSPORTATION
Committee and the Senate Education, Energy, and the Environment Committee on:
(i) Each project funded under paragraph (5)(iv)2 of this subsection;
and

SENATE BILL 153 11
(ii) A summary of any impacts that the funding used for these
projects had on overall funding for upgrading individual on–site sewage disposal systems
with best available technology for nitrogen removal.
9–1605.4.
(r) In conjunction with the report required under § 9–1605.2(j)(6) of this subtitle,
on or before December 31 each year, the Bay Restoration Fund Advisory Committee shall
report, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the Senate
[Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House Environment and Transportation Committee
on:
(1) The total amount expended and encumbered under this section:
(i) During the immediately preceding fiscal year; and
(ii) Since July 1, 2022;
(2) The amount and type of environmental outcomes purchased under this
section and the types of projects or practices that produced those outcomes, including
information on:
(i) The cost per unit of nitrogen reduced or removed; and
(ii) The relative contribution of each environmental outcome toward
closing any gaps in achieving the nutrient and sediment targets of the Chesapeake Bay
TMDL;
(3) The type and value of any co–benefits provided by projects or practices
funded under this section;
(4) The cost–effectiveness of environmental outcomes purchased under this
section as compared with other approaches to reducing nitrogen; and
(5) For fiscal year 2025 only, any amendments to this section necessary to
reflect historic and projected demand for funding from the Account and the Bay Restoration
Fund, including an assessment and recommendation on possible changes to the
percentages specified under subsection (f) of this section.
Article – Family Law
5–1206.
(a) On or before December 15, 2000, and annually thereafter until December 15,
2007, the Secretary of Human Services and the Secretary of Health shall report to the

SENATE BILL 153
Governor and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee, the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs]
FINANCE Committee, the House Appropriations Committee, and the House Health and
Government Operations Committee, on their progress in complying with the provisions of
this subtitle.
Article – Health – General
18–214.
(m) On or before December 15 of each year, the Commission shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, to the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental
Affairs] FINANCE Committee and the House Health and Government Operations
Committee.
18–1002.
On or before December 1, 2006, and annually thereafter, the Department shall report
to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the
Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] FINANCE Committee and the
House Health and Government Operations Committee on the activities of the Department
in implementing § 18–1001 of this subtitle.
19–1409.
(b) The Oversight Committee shall consist of the following members:
(1) [One member] TWO MEMBERS of the Senate Finance Committee,
appointed by the President of the Senate;
(2) [One member of the Senate Education, Health, and Environmental
Affairs Committee, appointed by the President of the Senate;
(3)] Two members ONE MEMBER of the House Health and Government
Operations Committee, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
[(4)] (3) The Secretary of Aging, or the Secretary’s designee;
[(5)] (4) The Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
[(6)] (5) The Director of the Office of Health Care Quality, or the
Director’s designee;
[(7)] (6) The Deputy Secretary for Behavioral Health, or the Deputy
Secretary’s designee;

SENATE BILL 153 13
[(8)] (7) The Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
[(9)] (8) The Secretary of Disabilities, or the Secretary’s designee;
[(10)] (9) The State Long–Term Care Ombudsman;
[(11)] (10) Two representatives of area agencies on aging, one of which shall
be a member of a local long–term care ombudsman program established under Title 10,
Subtitle 9 of the Human Services Article, selected by the President of the Maryland
Association of Area Agencies on Aging;
[(12)] (11) One representative of a local long–term care ombudsman entity,
selected by the State Long–Term Care Ombudsman;
[(13)] (12) Three consumer members, selected by the State Long–Term
Care Ombudsman, all of whom shall be consumers living in an assisted living facility or a
nursing home or have a family member living in an assisted living facility or a nursing
home;
[(14)] (13) The following representatives, selected by the organizations the
individual represents:
(i) One representative from the Health Facilities Association of
Maryland;
(ii) One representative from the Mid–Atlantic LifeSpan;
(iii) One representative of the Hospice Network of Maryland;
(iv) One representative of the Maryland Hospital Association;
(v) One representative of 1199SEIU United Health Workers East;
(vi) One representative of the Maryland Chapter of AARP;
(vii) One representative of United Seniors of Maryland;
(viii) One representative of Voices for Quality Care;
(ix) One representative of the Mental Health Association of
Maryland knowledgeable in issues of aging;
(x) One representative of the Greater Maryland Chapter of the
Alzheimer’s Association; and

SENATE BILL 153
(xi) One representative of the Maryland Association of Adult Day
Services; and
[(15)] (14) Three representatives from the assisted living industry, of which
one shall represent a program that cares for one to four residents, one shall represent a
program that cares for five to nine residents, and one shall represent a program that cares
for more than 10 residents.
Article – Health Occupations
8–6C–12.
(c) Beginning December 1, 2016, and on each December 1 thereafter, the Board
shall submit to the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] FINANCE
Committee and the House Health and Government Operations Committee, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article:
(1) The report submitted to the Board under subsection (a)(10) of this
section;
(2) In consultation with the Committee, any recommendations regarding
the continuation and improvement of the licensure of licensed direct–entry midwives in the
State;
(3) Any recommendations regarding expanding the scope of practice of
licensed direct–entry midwives; and
(4) Any recommendations, including recommendations for legislation,
regarding the scope of practice of licensed direct–entry midwives to include vaginal birth
after cesarean.
Article – Housing and Community Development
6–308.4.
(a) On or before December 1 of each year, the Department shall submit a report
on the Program, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the Senate
Budget and Taxation Committee, the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental
Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee, the House
Appropriations Committee, and the House Environment and Transportation Committee.
Article – Labor and Employment
5–308.1.
(b) The Commissioner shall submit notice regarding any modifications made to,
or directives issued interpreting, the federal Bloodborne Pathogen Standard after

SENATE BILL 153 15
November 5, 1999 and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, make
recommendations for any legislative changes to the House Health and Government
Operations Committee, the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs]
FINANCE Committee, and the General Assembly within 30 days of the issuance of
modifications to the Bloodborne Pathogen Standard.
Article – Local Government
22–102.
(e) (2) When the State Department of Assessments and Taxation accepts the
articles of incorporation for record:
(ii) the Chief Executive of the incorporating local government, or any
other official designated in the local law establishing the Resilience Authority, shall submit
the articles of incorporation, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
to:
1. the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee and the
Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee; and
22–113.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, on or before the January 1
after a Resilience Authority is established by a local government in accordance with this
title, and on or before January 1 each year thereafter, the Resilience Authority shall submit
a report in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article to:
(i) the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee and the Senate
[Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee; and
Article – Natural Resources
4–11A–03.2.
(c) (1) The Coordinating Council shall:
(i) Formulate and make proposals to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate [Education, Health,
and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT
Committee and the House Environment and Transportation Committee on or before
September 1 each year for advancing Maryland aquaculture, including recommendations
for a fee structure on aquaculture operations in order to reduce State expenditures on
aquaculture programs;

SENATE BILL 153
5–103.
(h) On or before September 30 of each year, the Department or local authority
shall submit to the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION,
ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House [Environmental Matters]
ENVIRONMENT AND TRANSPORTATION Committee a report on:
(1) The number and location of each construction activity subject to the
requirements of this section;
(2) The amount and location of acres cleared, conserved, and planted in
connection with the activity; and
(3) The amount of reforestation fees collected and expended.
5–2A–03.
(f) (1) On or before December 1, 2024, and each December 1 thereafter, the
Commission shall submit a report to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the
Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee, the House Appropriations Committee, and the House
Environment and Transportation Committee in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
5–1613.
On or before September 30 of each year, the Department shall submit, subject to §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the Senate [Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee
and the House Environment and Transportation Committee a statewide report, compiled
from local authorities’ reports to the Department, on:
(1) The number, location, and type of projects subject to the provisions of
this subtitle;
(2) The amount and location of acres cleared, conserved, and planted,
including any areas which utilize forest mitigation bank credits or areas located in the 100
year floodplain, in connection with a development project;
(3) The amount of reforestation and afforestation fees and noncompliance
penalties collected and expended, the number of acres for which the fees were collected, and
the number of acres reforested, afforested, or conserved using the fees;
(4) The costs of implementing the forest conservation program;

SENATE BILL 153 17
(5) The size, location, and protection of any local forest mitigation banks
which are created under a local or State program;
(6) The number, location, and type of violations and type of enforcement
activity conducted in accordance with this subtitle; and
(7) To the extent practicable, the size and location of all conserved and
planted forest areas, submitted in an electronic geographic information system or computer
aided design format.
Article – Public Safety
1–307.
(a) The Board shall submit an annual report to the Governor, the Secretary, and,
subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Legislative Policy Committee, the
Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee, and the House Health and Government Operations
Committee.
(c) The Department shall summarize and analyze the information provided
under subsection (b)(3) of this section and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, submit to the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs]
EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House Health and
Government Operations Committee:
(1) the summary and analysis;
(2) any associated recommendations to address issues raised by the
analysis; and
(3) a description of any measures implemented by the Department to
address issues raised by the analysis.
Article – Public Utilities
4–308.
(d) (2) The Commission shall send a copy of the report to the Office of People’s
Counsel, the Office of Home Energy Programs, and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the Senate [Finance] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House Economic Matters Committee.
7–217.

SENATE BILL 153
(i) (1) An investor–owned electric company that establishes an electric school
bus pilot program authorized by this section shall, in consultation with each participating
school system, by February 1, 2025, and each year thereafter for the duration of the pilot
program, report on the status of the pilot program to the Governor, the Commission, and,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the House Economic Matters
Committee and the Senate [Finance] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT
Committee.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–2A–04.
(e) (1) On or before December 31 each year, the Office shall report to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate
Budget and Taxation Committee, the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental
Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee, the House
Appropriations Committee, the House Health and Government Operations Committee, and
the Joint Committee on Cybersecurity, Information Technology, and Biotechnology on the
activities of the Office and the state of cybersecurity preparedness in Maryland, including:
(i) the activities and accomplishments of the Office during the
previous 12 months at the State and local levels; and
(ii) a compilation and analysis of the data from the information
contained in the reports received by the Office under § 3.5–405 of this title, including:
1. a summary of the issues identified by the cybersecurity
preparedness assessments conducted that year;
2. the status of vulnerability assessments of all units of State
government and a timeline for completion and cost to remediate any vulnerabilities
exposed;
3. recent audit findings of all units of State government and
options to improve findings in future audits, including recommendations for staff, budget,
and timing;
4. analysis of the State’s expenditure on cybersecurity
relative to overall information technology spending for the prior 3 years and
recommendations for changes to the budget, including amount, purpose, and timing to
improve State and local cybersecurity preparedness;
5. efforts to secure financial support for cyber risk mitigation
from federal or other non–State resources;

SENATE BILL 153 19
6. key performance indicators on the cybersecurity strategies
in the Department’s information technology master plan, including time, budget, and staff
required for implementation; and
7. any additional recommendations for improving State and
local cybersecurity preparedness.
3.5–317.
(d) (1) Every 2 years, a contractor shall provide the results of the assessments
to:
(ii) in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the Senate [Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee,
and the House Health and Government Operations Committee.
5–408.
(k) In accordance with the requirements of § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the Department and the Foundation shall report on the certification program on or
before January 15 of each year to:
(3) the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee and the Senate
[Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee; and
13–108.
(b) (5) If supplies or commodities procured under an emergency procurement
contract are not delivered and used within 1 month after the date the contract is awarded,
the unit shall:
(ii) submit the reports prepared under this paragraph to the Board,
the appropriate control agency, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, [the Senate Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs Committee,] the House Appropriations Committee, the House
Health and Government Operations Committee, and the Joint Audit and Evaluation
Committee.
13–112.1.
(e) (4) The Maryland Environmental Service shall provide copies of each
review conducted under this subsection to:

SENATE BILL 153
(ii) in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee, the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the House
Environment and Transportation Committee, and the House Appropriations Committee.
14–110.
(e) Within 60 days after receipt of all of the reports required under subsections
(c) and (d) of this section, the Department of General Services shall submit a summary of
the information to:
(2) in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] BUDGET AND TAXATION
Committee, the House Health and Government Operations Committee, and the Legislative
Policy Committee.
15–111.
(c) Within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year, the Chief Procurement Officer
shall submit to the Governor, the Legislative Policy Committee, the Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee, [the Senate Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs
Committee,] the House Appropriations Committee, the House Health and Government
Operations Committee, and the Joint Audit and Evaluation Committee a consolidated
report that includes each report required under subsection (a) of this section.
Article – State Government
6–506.
On or before July 1, 2022, and each July 1 thereafter, the Ombudsman shall,
consistent with federal and State privacy laws and in accordance with § 2–1257 of this
article, submit a report to the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs]
EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House Committee
on Ways and Means that includes:
(1) the number and type of calls received on the toll–free telephone number
during the previous year;
(2) any patterns of complaints filed by parents identified under §
6–504(a)(7) of this subtitle;
(3) a summary of the services provided by the Ombudsman during the
previous year; and

SENATE BILL 153 21
(4) any recommendations the Ombudsman determines are appropriate and
necessary concerning the State’s implementation of special education services and
procedures.
9–1007.
(b) At the request of the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House, the
Chair of the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION,
ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee, or the Chair of the House Health and
Government Operations Committee, the State Archivist shall review, evaluate, and make
recommendations to the General Assembly regarding State designations under Title 7 of
the General Provisions Article.
9–20B–12.
(a) On or before January 1 of each year, the Administration shall report to the
Governor, to the Board, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of this article, to the General
Assembly and the members of the Senate [Finance] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT Committee and the House Economic Matters Committee on the uses and
expenditures of the Fund from the prior fiscal year.
Article – Transportation
7–406.
(f) (1) On or before January 1, 2022, and each January 1 thereafter, the
Administration shall, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, submit
a report to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the Senate [Education, Health,
and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT
Committee, the House Appropriations Committee, and the House Environment and
Transportation Committee on the implementation of this section.
8–609.
(c) By December 1, 1994, and on request of the committees thereafter, the
Department shall submit a report under subsections (a) and (b) of this section on the
management and control of the spread of phragmites to:
(2) The [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] EDUCATION,
ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT Committee of the Senate of Maryland.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The

SENATE BILL 153
publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note following
the section affected.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.